Georgia, session 2025_26, HB73.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act creating the Board of Education of Seminole County, approved March 14, 1983 (Ga.
L. 1983, p. 3994), as amended, is amended by revising Section 3 as follows:
"SECTION 3.
(a) All members who are elected to the board shall be elected in accordance with Chapter 2
of Title 21 of the O.C.G.A., the 'Georgia Election Code.' All elections for members of the
board conducted after August 1, 2025, shall be nonpartisan elections as provided for in
Code Section 21-2-139 of the O.C.G.A. Nothing in this subsection shall affect the terms
of office of the members of the board in office on the effective date of this subsection.
H. B. 73
- 1 -

LC 47 3148/AP
Such sitting members shall serve out the terms of office for which such members were
elected and shall be eligible to succeed themselves.
(b)(1) Elections shall be held to elect board members from districts one, three, and five
at the nonpartisan general election held in 2026.
(2) Elections shall be held to elect board members from districts two and four at the
nonpartisan general election held in 2028.
(3) Successors to the members elected pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (2) of this
subsection shall be elected at the nonpartisan general election which is conducted in the
year in which the respective terms of office shall expire.
(c) Persons elected to the board shall take office on the first day of January following their
election and shall serve for a term of four years and until their successors are elected and
qualified."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 73
- 2 -